apertium-olo-fin.olo.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for UNDEFINED language
! Copyright © 2012 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

!! Morphology
!! ----------
!! INTRODUCTION TO MORPHOLOGICAL ANALYSER OF UNDEFINED LANGUAGE.

Multichar_Symbols
!! Analysis symbols
!! ----------------
!! The morphological analyses of wordforms of UNDEFINED language are presented
!! in this system in terms of following symbols.
!! (It is highly suggested to follow existing standards when adding new tags).
%<tyä%> ! This alerts workers of work to be done

!! The parts-of-speech are:
 %<a%> ! adjective
 %<adv%> ! adverb
 %<cs%> ! subordinating conjunction
 %<cc%> ! coordinating conjunction
 %<interj%> ! interjection 
 %<n%> ! noun
 %<pcle%> ! particle
 %<po%> ! postposition
 %<pr%> ! preposition
 %<pron%> ! pronoun
 %<qnt%> ! quantifier
 %<v%> ! verb
 %<num%> ! numeral 

! Depricate This CONJ
%<conj%>
!! The parts of speech are further split up into:
 %<prop%>

!! !!Pronouns
 %<dem%>	 !!≈ ;@CODE@: demonstrative
 %<indef%>  !!≈ ;@CODE@: indefinite
 %<dep%> 	 !!≈ ;@CODE@: dependent word requiring the presence of another, e.g. __мень__
 %<interr%> !!≈ ;@CODE@: interrogative
 %<pers%> 	 !!≈ ;@CODE@: personal
 %<recipr%> !!≈ ;@CODE@: reciprocal
 %<refl%> 	 !!≈ ;@CODE@: reflexive
 %<rel%> 	 !!≈ ;@CODE@: relative




!! The Usage extents are marked using following tags:
 %<use_sub%>   
 %<use_-spell%> 

!! The nominals are inflected in the following Case and Number
! number
 %<sg%> ! singular
 %<pl%> ! plural
! case
 %<abe%> ! abessive
 %<abl%> ! ablative case
 %<acc%> ! accusative
 %<com%> ! comitative
 %<dat%> ! dative case
 %<ela%> ! elative
 %<ess%> ! elative
 %<gen%> ! genitive case
 %<ill%> ! illative
 %<ine%> ! inessive
 %<ins%> ! instrumental
 %<loc%> ! Locative 
 %<nom%> ! nominative case
 %<par%> ! partitive
 %<prl%> ! prolative 
 %<tra%> ! translative



 %<pros%> %<adc%> %<apr%> %<egr%>
 %<ter%>


!! The possession is marked as such:
 %<pxsg1%> %<pxsg2%> %<pxsg3%> %<pxpl1%> %<pxpl2%> %<pxpl3%>
!! The comparative forms are:
%<pos%> %<comp%> %<superl%>
!! Numerals are classified under:
 %<attr%> %<card%>
 %<ord%> 
!! Verb moods are:
 %<ind%> %<prs%> %<prt%> %<pot%> %<cond%> %<imprt%>
!! Verb personal forms are:
! Subject conjugation
%<scsg1%> %<scsg2%> %<scsg3%> 
%<scpl1%> %<scpl2%> %<scpl3%>

! Reflexive conjugation
%<rcsg1%> %<rcsg2%> %<rcsg3%> 
%<rcpl1%> %<rcpl2%> %<rcpl3%>

%<rcsg%>
%<rcpl%>

!! Other verb forms are
 %<der_inf_ta%> %<ger%> %<conneg%> %<neg%> %<imprtii%> %<prsprc%>
 %<prfprc%>%
 %<prfprcpl3%>
 %<sup%> %<vgen%> %<vabess%>

!! The verbs are syntactically split according to transitivity:
 %<tv%> %<iv%>

!! Question and Focus particles:
 %<qst%> %<foc%>
%<foc_gi%>
%<foc_hai%>


!! Semantics are classified with
 %<sem_mal%> %<sem_fem%> %<sem_sur%>
 %<sem_plc%>
 %<sem_org%>
 %<sem_obj%>
 %<sem_ani%>
 %<sem_hum%>
 %<sem_plant%>
 %<sem_group%>
 %<sem_time%>
 %<sem_txt%>
 %<sem_route%>
 %<sem_measr%>
 %<sem_wthr%>
 %<sem_build%>
 %<sem_edu%>
 %<sem_veh%>
 %<sem_clth%>


!! Derivations are classified under the morphophonetic form of the suffix, the
!! source and target part-of-speech.
 %<v→n%> %<v→v%> %<v→a%>

%<der_ta%>
%<der_te%>
%<der_inf_ma%>
%<der_n%>
%<der_tu%>
%<der_ia%>


!! Morphophonology
!! ---------------
!! To represent phonologic variations in word forms we use the following
!! symbols in the lexicon files:
 {aä} {oö} {uü}
 A1 ! 
 O1 !
 U1 !
 A2 ! used with verb types V_AVATA 
!! And following triggers to control variation
 {front} {back}
%>
%^DEVOICE
 %^WEAK ! weak grade
 %^E1 ! causes a:e in kandua : kannettu
 %^SyllBound ! syllable boundary
 %^T2Z ! Triggers ti=>zi
 %^A2O ! before plural "i"
 %^A2U ! %<nom%>%<sg%>
 %^NONE ! no regular change
 %^KS2S ! "Anuksen" is "Anus" in the nominative singular 
QAQ1 QAO1 EH1 QEQ1 INE1 ZD1 ZS1 V1
AO1 EI1 ZS1 ZD1 
! These are for developing underlying morphology rules
D1 E1
N1

!! We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
!! flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics:
@P.NeedNoun.ON@  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  @C.NeedNoun@

LEXICON Root
!! The word forms in UNDEFINED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
!! word classes, or optionally from prefixes:

   adjectives  ;
   adverbs  ;
   conjunctions  ;
   interjections  ;
   nouns   ;
   postpositions    ;
   prepositions    ;
   pronouns    ;
   propernouns    ;
   quantifiers    ;
   verbs	  ;
!Abbreviation ;	! stems/abbr.lexc
!Acronym ;    	! stems/acro.lexc
!Punctuation ;
 Exceptions ;

! I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
! WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

LEXICON CONJ_
%<conj%>: # ;

LEXICON CC_
%<cc%>: # ;
 
LEXICON CS_
%<cs%>: # ;
 

LEXICON INTERJ_
%<interj%>: # ;

!LEXICON NUMERAL
!%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUMBERSUF
%<num%>: K;
%<num%>:%> CASESUF ;
%<num%>:%> ORDINAL ;

LEXICON ORDINAL
%<ord%>:этӥ K;

LEXICON PCLE_
%<pcle%>: #;

LEXICON K
%<foc_gi%>:%>gi # ;
%<foc_hai%>:%>hA1i # ;
%<qst%>:%>go # ;
# ; 


LEXICON PO_
%<po%>: # ; 

LEXICON PREP_
%<pr%>: # ; 

 
LEXICON ADV_
%<adv%>: # ; 

LEXICON MANNER_
%<adv%>%<manner%>: K ;

LEXICON SPAT_
%<adv%>%<spat%>: K ;

LEXICON TEMP_
%<adv%>%<temp%>: K ;

LEXICON CASESUF
#; 

LEXICON DEM
#; 

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER
# ;



LEXICON conjunctions

da:da CC_  ;
kui:kui CS_  ;
libo:libo CC_  ;
muga% že:muga% že CONJ_  ;
sendäh:sendäh CONJ_  ;
vie:vie CONJ_  ;
što:što CS_  ;
štobi:štobi CS_  ;



LEXICON Exceptions

!! Proper given names female
Jelena:Jelena PROP_ ;
Natalja:Natalja PROP_ ;
Olʼga:Olʼga PROP_ ;

!! Proper given names male
Aleksandr:Aleksandr PROP_ ;
Santtu:Santtu PROP_ ;

!! Place names
Priäžä:Priäžä PROP_ ;
Suomi:Suom PROP_ ;
Vieljärvi:Vieljärv PROP_ ;


LEXICON interjections

aku:aku INTERJ_  ;
al:al INTERJ_  ;
ali:ali INTERJ_  ;
däh:däh INTERJ_  ;
ei:ei INTERJ_  ;
ga:ga INTERJ_  ;
gai:gai INTERJ_  ;
hoi:hoi INTERJ_  ;
hoš:hoš INTERJ_  ;
jo:jo INTERJ_  ;
joi:joi INTERJ_  ;
ka:ka INTERJ_  ;
ka:ka INTERJ_  ;
kei:kei INTERJ_  ;
konah:konah INTERJ_  ;
konzu:konzu INTERJ_  ;
konzu-tahto:konzu-tahto INTERJ_  ;
korvah:korvah INTERJ_  ;
kouzollou:kouzollou INTERJ_  ;
ku:ku INTERJ_  ;
kuda-ken:kuda-ken INTERJ_  ;
kuda-kui:kuda-kui INTERJ_  ;
kuda-midä:kuda-midä INTERJ_  ;
kuda-mis:kuda-mis INTERJ_  ;
kulleh:kulleh INTERJ_  ;
kulmas:kulmas INTERJ_  ;
kus:kus INTERJ_  ;
la:la INTERJ_  ;
libo:libo INTERJ_  ;
migu:migu INTERJ_  ;
mindäh:mindäh INTERJ_  ;
mis:mis INTERJ_  ;
myö:myö INTERJ_  ;
no:no INTERJ_  ;
nolja:nolja INTERJ_  ;
näi:näi INTERJ_  ;
piäh:piäh INTERJ_  ;
piäle:piäle INTERJ_  ;
piäs:piäs INTERJ_  ;
päin% (istuo% p.):päin% (istuo% p.) INTERJ_  ;
se:se INTERJ_  ;
se:se INTERJ_  ;
tai:tai INTERJ_  ;
tuan:tuan INTERJ_  ;
täs% kai:täs% kai INTERJ_  ;
vaigu:vaigu INTERJ_  ;
vie:vie INTERJ_  ;
voit% olla:voit% olla INTERJ_  ;


LEXICON postpositions

mugah:mugah PO_  ;

LEXICON prepositions

alle:alle PREP_  ;
aloh:aloh PREP_  ;
ennem:ennem PREP_  ;
ennen:ennen PREP_  ;
ielpäi:ielpäi PREP_  ;
kohtas:kohtas PREP_  ;
kohti:kohti PREP_  ;
luo:luo PREP_  ;
niškoi:niškoi PREP_  ;
näh:näh PREP_  ;
periä:periä PREP_  ;
rinnal:rinnal PREP_  ;
sah:sah PREP_  ;
tokkua:tokkua PREP_  ;
täh:täh PREP_  ;
vastal:vastal PREP_  ;

LEXICON adverbs
ahtahasti:ahtahasti ADV_  ;
aiganah:aiganah ADV_  ;
aijakse% (midä% a.):aijakse% (midä% a.) ADV_  ;
aijei:aijei ADV_  ;
aijembi:aijembi ADV_  ;
aijoitellen:aijoitellen ADV_  ;
aivokkazeh:aivokkazeh ADV_  ;
alahassah:alahassah ADV_  ;
alalleh:alalleh ADV_  ;
alembi:alembi ADV_  ;
allah:allah ADV_  ;
ammui:ammui ADV_  ;
ammužis% ajois:ammužis% ajois ADV_  ;
arbuamattah:arbuamattah ADV_  ;
astuen:astuen ADV_  ;
azettumattah:azettumattah ADV_  ;
bokattavalleh:bokattavalleh ADV_  ;
diivu:diivu ADV_  ;
duumis:duumis ADV_  ;
edehänä:edehänä ADV_  ;
ehki:ehki ADV_  ;
ei% hätkekse:ei% hätkekse ADV_  ;
ei% kebesti:ei% kebesti ADV_  ;
ei% selgieh:ei% selgieh ADV_  ;
ei% vähäine:ei% vähäine ADV_  ;
elävälleh:elävälleh ADV_  ;
enembälleh:enembälleh ADV_  ;
enimäl:enimäl ADV_  ;
ennem% aigua:ennem% aigua ADV_  ;
ennättämižeh:ennättämižeh ADV_  ;
enämbi:enämbi ADV_  ;
eriluaduh:eriluaduh ADV_  ;
erähässypiän:erähässypiän ADV_  ;
eule% kummu:eule% kummu ADV_  ;
ezin:ezin ADV_  ;
ezmäžikse:ezmäžikse ADV_  ;
hairahuksis:hairahuksis ADV_  ;
harvah:harvah ADV_  ;
heittelemättäh:heittelemättäh ADV_  ;
hembieh:hembieh ADV_  ;
hienosti:hienosti ADV_  ;
hilläh:hilläh ADV_  ;
hilläžeh:hilläžeh ADV_  ;
hoikkažesti:hoikkažesti ADV_  ;
huavoluguh:huavoluguh ADV_  ;
huomenekse:huomenekse ADV_  ;
hural:hural ADV_  ;
hyvä:hyvä ADV_  ;
hännäkki:hännäkki ADV_  ;
hätken:hätken ADV_  ;
ielleh:ielleh ADV_  ;
iespäi:iespäi ADV_  ;
ihan:ihan ADV_  ;
ilmal:ilmal ADV_  ;
ilokas:ilokas ADV_  ;
iralleh:iralleh ADV_  ;
iänettäh:iänettäh ADV_  ;
iče:iče ADV_  ;
jallai:jallai ADV_  ;
jalosti:jalosti ADV_  ;
jiä:jiä ADV_  ;
jo:jo TEMP_  ;
joga% sijas:joga% sijas ADV_  ;
jugei:jugei ADV_  ;
juovuksis:juovuksis ADV_  ;
juuri% muga:juuri% muga ADV_  ;
järgieh:järgieh ADV_  ;
kahtalleh:kahtalleh ADV_  ;
kahtu% kuražilleh:kahtu% kuražilleh ADV_  ;
kaikinneh:kaikinneh ADV_  ;
kaikkieh% luaduh:kaikkieh% luaduh ADV_  ;
kaiče:kaiče ADV_  ;
kaksielpäi:kaksielpäi ADV_  ;
kallehesti:kallehesti ADV_  ;
kebježeh:kebježeh ADV_  ;
keskeh:keskeh ADV_  ;
kierral:kierral ADV_  ;
kiirehesti:kiirehesti ADV_  ;
kirkiesti:kirkiesti ADV_  ;
kohtalleh:kohtalleh ADV_  ;
kolmičči:kolmičči ADV_  ;
kougeloh:kougeloh ADV_  ;
kui:kui ADV_  ;
kummu:kummu ADV_  ;
kuuluu:kuuluu ADV_  ;
köyhästi:köyhästi ADV_  ;
lendäen:lendäen ADV_  ;
liijan:liijan ADV_  ;
loiton:loiton ADV_  ;
lopukse:lopukse ADV_  ;
lujasti:lujasti ADV_  ;
läbi:läbi ADV_  ;
lähil:lähil ADV_  ;
madalal:madalal ADV_  ;
mielelväh:mielelväh ADV_  ;
mittuine% ollou:mittuine% ollou ADV_  ;
mugah:mugah ADV_  ;
mustoh:mustoh ADV_  ;
myöhembi:myöhembi ADV_  ;
nellinkondožin:nellinkondožin ADV_  ;
nenga:nenga ADV_  ;
nikenen:nikenen ADV_  ;
nygöi:nygöi ADV_  ;
näiväkösti:näiväkösti ADV_  ;
oivalleh:oivalleh ADV_  ;
onnuako:onnuako ADV_  ;
pahas% tavas:pahas% tavas ADV_  ;
parahasti:parahasti ADV_  ;
perembä:perembä ADV_  ;
pidužin:pidužin ADV_  ;
pikoivähäine:pikoivähäine ADV_  ;
piälailleh:piälailleh ADV_  ;
piälpäi:piälpäi ADV_  ;
proijittuo:proijittuo ADV_  ;
puhtahakse:puhtahakse ADV_  ;
putti:putti ADV_  ;
pällähin% jalloin:pällähin% jalloin ADV_  ;
raviembi:raviembi ADV_  ;
rinnakkai:rinnakkai ADV_  ;
roiheze:roiheze ADV_  ;
ryydäen:ryydäen ADV_  ;
selgiesti:selgiesti ADV_  ;
sen% sijah:sen% sijah ADV_  ;
sijah:sijah ADV_  ;
silloi:silloi ADV_  ;
sit:sit ADV_  ;
sogevuksis:sogevuksis ADV_  ;
sumbah:sumbah ADV_  ;
sydämespäi:sydämespäi ADV_  ;
tagaperin:tagaperin ADV_  ;
tarkah:tarkah ADV_  ;
terväh:terväh ADV_  ;
tiäpäi:tiäpäi ADV_  ;
tokko:tokko ADV_  ;
tovessah:tovessah ADV_  ;
tukkunah:tukkunah ADV_  ;
tuonepäi:tuonepäi ADV_  ;
tyhjiä:tyhjiä ADV_  ;
tänäpäi:tänäpäi ADV_  ;
täydyy:täydyy ADV_  ;
uijen:uijen ADV_  ;
unimielis:unimielis ADV_  ;
vahnembi:vahnembi ADV_  ;
valehite:valehite ADV_  ;
varattomah:varattomah ADV_  ;
varuksis:varuksis ADV_  ;
vastukarai:vastukarai ADV_  ;
vereksel:vereksel ADV_  ;
viijei:viijei ADV_  ;
vinoh:vinoh ADV_  ;
vuottamah:vuottamah ADV_  ;
vähimyölleh:vähimyölleh ADV_  ;
vähäizel:vähäizel ADV_  ;
välizissä:välizissä ADV_  ;
väzyksissäh:väzyksissäh ADV_  ;
yhteltiedy:yhteltiedy ADV_  ;
yhtyhoduu:yhtyhoduu ADV_  ;
yksimieližesti:yksimieližesti ADV_  ;
ylen% terväh:ylen% terväh ADV_  ;
ylähänpäi:ylähänpäi ADV_  ;
yöl:yöl ADV_  ;
äijähkel:äijähkel ADV_  ;
LEXICON nouns
hyvin:hyvin ADV_  ;
